Washington statutes.
RCW 19.186.040

Liability of contract purchaser or assignee—Notice.

A person who purchases or is otherwise assigned a roofing or siding contract shall be subject to all claims and defenses with respect to the contract that the homeowner could assert against the siding or roofing contractor or salesperson. A person who sells or otherwise assigns a roofing or siding contract shall include a prominent notice of the potential liability under this section.

[ 1994 c 285 s 5.]